glossing/lexicons/preverbs.lexc
@U.V.iv@кыёԓгык:@U.V.iv@к%{ы%}ёԓг INTER-V ;        ! to tip over
@U.V.iv@увигтэнъэк:@U.V.iv@увигтэнъ%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to take a shower
@U.V.iv@йыԓӄыгаԓяк:@U.V.iv@йыԓӄыгаԓя INTER-V ;        ! to lose sleep
@U.V.tv@рыӄэтыкватык:@U.V.tv@рыӄэтыкват INTER-V ;        ! to freeze
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэгниръуԓгэтык:@U.V.iv@э’ӄ%{Æ%}гниръуԓг%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to begin to heat (of the sun)
@U.V.iv@инэнчыӄэтык:@U.V.iv@инэнчыӄ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to go deep into
@U.V.tv@кытгэмӈыток:@U.V.tv@кытгэмӈыто INTER-V ;        ! to wash and brush s.o
@U.V.tv@чыгрымӈэтык:@U.V.tv@чыгрымӈэт INTER-V ;        ! to sing songs to one’s ancestors
@U.V.tv@кычечьивык:@U.V.tv@кычечьив INTER-V ;        ! to pursue
@U.V.iv@а’раӄавык:@U.V.iv@а’раӄав INTER-V ;        ! to persist
@U.V.tv@ӄытԓьатык:@U.V.tv@ӄытԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to offend
@U.V.iv@овпэрак:@U.V.iv@овпэра INTER-V ;        ! to seem dark, black
@U.V.iv@черыӈчатык:@U.V.iv@черыӈчат INTER-V ;        ! to be agitated
@U.V.iv@ӄантакватык:@U.V.iv@ӄантакват INTER-V ;        ! to shake
@U.V.tv@пычеӈик:@U.V.tv@п%{ы%}чеӈи INTER-V ;        ! to ask insistently
@U.V.tv@рыԓпэрык:@U.V.tv@рыԓпэр INTER-V ;        ! to make s.o
@U.V.iv@энанпэравык:@U.V.iv@энанпэрав INTER-V ;        ! to adorn
@U.V.tv@мэйӈыркурык:@U.V.tv@м%{Æ%}йӈыркур INTER-V ;        ! to make s.o
@U.V.tv@тэмъюӈык:@U.V.tv@тэмъюӈ INTER-V ;        ! to deceive
@U.V.tv@гитгык:@U.V.tv@гитг INTER-V ;        ! to be missing
@U.V.iv@гынотъыԓёръок:@U.V.iv@гынотъыԓёръо INTER-V ;        ! to come (of midday)
@U.V.iv@ӄэтыӈӈок:@U.V.iv@ӄэтыӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! to arrive (of autumn)
@U.V.iv@ёпытвак:@U.V.iv@ёпытва INTER-V ;        ! to observe
@U.V.iv@татымкычьыӈык:@U.V.iv@татымкычьыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to make muscles, to show one’s muscles
@U.V.iv@ӄораркыԓяк:@U.V.iv@ӄораркыԓя INTER-V ;        ! to run after the reindeer
@U.V.tv@мытӄэтык:@U.V.tv@мытӄэт INTER-V ;        ! to grease
@U.V.iv@тэнтыԓек:@U.V.iv@тэнтыԓе INTER-V ;        ! to have a good travel
@U.V.iv@итъунтэтык:@U.V.iv@итъунт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to slip
@U.V.iv@тэвиминӈэтык:@U.V.iv@т%{Æ%}виминӈ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be in need
@U.V.iv@рытваӈатык:@U.V.iv@р%{ы%}тваӈат INTER-V ;        ! to appear
@U.V.iv@вэнӄатык:@U.V.iv@вэнӄат INTER-V ;        ! to be indisposed
@U.V.iv@пԓекгытԓик:@U.V.iv@пԓекгытԓи INTER-V ;        ! to spoil one’s boots
@U.V.iv@нутэӄитпэвык:@U.V.iv@нут%{Æ%}ӄитп%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to rejoice to see the earth
@U.V.tv@кыргук:@U.V.tv@кыргу INTER-V ;        ! to master
@U.V.tv@э’рагаԓяк:@U.V.tv@э’рагаԓя INTER-V ;        ! to overtake
@U.V.iv@ӄитпыԓьэвык:@U.V.iv@ӄитпыԓь%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to strive, to work swiftly
@U.V.iv@киԓвэйык:@U.V.iv@киԓв%{Æ%}й INTER-V ;        ! to celebrate the festivities of the antlers
@U.V.iv@ԓыгэвъэӈӈок:@U.V.iv@ԓыгэвъэӈӈо INTER-V ;        ! just before dying
@U.V.tv@рыԓьэтыӈэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ԓьэтыӈэт INTER-V ;        ! to let run away
@U.V.iv@нанӄыпыгтык:@U.V.iv@нанӄыпыгт INTER-V ;        ! to have a stomach ache
@U.V.iv@гыроԓьынвыпэнрык:@U.V.iv@гыроԓьынвыпэнр INTER-V ;        ! to go to the place of calving
@U.V.iv@гынук:@U.V.iv@г%{ы%}ну INTER-V ;        ! to be superfluous
@U.V.iv@танайыԓгыӈыткок:@U.V.iv@танайыԓгыӈытко INTER-V ;        ! тo threaten
@U.V.iv@чиӈивэӄэтык:@U.V.iv@чиӈивэӄ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to manage
@U.V.tv@тэвчаткок:@U.V.tv@тэвчатко INTER-V ;        ! to wag, to stir up
@U.V.iv@егрыгаԓяӈатык:@U.V.iv@егрыгаԓяӈат INTER-V ;        ! to quench thirst
@U.V.tv@тинээрӈык:@U.V.tv@тинэ%{Æ%}рӈ INTER-V ;        ! to add
@U.V.tv@ръэмэтэвык:@U.V.tv@ръэмэтэв INTER-V ;        ! to draw, to tow
@U.V.tv@рырымэк:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}рымэ INTER-V ;        ! to put aside
@U.V.tv@рывытовык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}вытов INTER-V ;        ! to feed with leaves
@U.V.tv@ворвыӄатвык:@U.V.tv@ворвыӄатв INTER-V ;        ! to offer up a dog as a sacrifice
@U.V.tv@тэӈимԓюк:@U.V.tv@т%{Æ%}ӈимԓю INTER-V ;        ! to dry in the wind
@U.V.iv@рэӄык:@U.V.iv@рэӄ INTER-V ;        ! to happen
@U.V.iv@пэгԓяткок:@U.V.iv@пэгԓятко INTER-V ;        ! to crack
@U.V.tv@рытгытԓягнаръовык:@U.V.tv@рытгытԓягнаръов INTER-V ;        ! to inflame
@U.V.tv@рыӈытэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ӈытэт INTER-V ;        ! to tear off
@U.V.tv@рымытӄувык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}мытӄув INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@эԓеръук:@U.V.iv@%{Æ%}ԓеръу INTER-V ;        ! to spend the summer
@U.V.tv@рыкававык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}кавав INTER-V ;        ! to make an offering to the fire
@U.V.tv@aчыӈык:@U.V.tv@aчыӈ INTER-V ;        ! à deux
@U.V.iv@йыӈэчыкуръук:@U.V.iv@йыӈ%{Æ%}чыкуръу INTER-V ;        ! to be shrouded in fog
@U.V.tv@ӈыток:@U.V.tv@ӈ%{ы%}то INTER-V ;        ! to go out to s.o
@U.V.tv@рымэйӈэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}мэйӈэв INTER-V ;        ! to make bigger
@U.V.iv@аԓкытвак:@U.V.iv@аԓкытва INTER-V ;        ! to remain at sea
@U.V.iv@йыԓӄысӄивык:@U.V.iv@йыԓӄысӄив INTER-V ;        ! to go to bed, to go to sleep
@U.V.iv@туунъыӈык:@U.V.iv@туунъыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to gather berries
@U.V.tv@ымытвыԓьатык:@U.V.tv@ымытвыԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to repeat
@U.V.iv@тааӄок:@U.V.iv@тааӄо INTER-V ;        ! to smoke
@U.V.iv@койӈыԓпатык:@U.V.iv@койӈыԓпат INTER-V ;        ! to drink a cup
@U.V.tv@рыԓыватык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ԓыват INTER-V ;        ! to feed a child at the breast
@U.V.iv@рэсӄунӈык:@U.V.iv@р%{Æ%}сӄунӈ INTER-V ;        ! to try to get up
@U.V.tv@руйвэԓӈык:@U.V.tv@руйв%{Æ%}ԓӈ INTER-V ;        ! to cast a spell
@U.V.tv@винвивык:@U.V.tv@винвив INTER-V ;        ! to denounce
@U.V.iv@эргыръочычак:@U.V.iv@эргыръочыча INTER-V ;        ! to dawn gradually
@U.V.iv@игэтык:@U.V.iv@иг%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to be cool
@U.V.iv@вэԓватвак:@U.V.iv@вэԓватва INTER-V ;        ! to be inactive
@U.V.tv@груԓмыԓьэтык:@U.V.tv@груԓмыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to whirl
@U.V.iv@унмэтйик:@U.V.iv@унм%{Æ%}тйи INTER-V ;        ! to spoil
@U.V.iv@э’рамъяттак:@U.V.iv@э’рамъятта INTER-V ;        ! to run along
@U.V.iv@кыргымчек:@U.V.iv@кыргымче INTER-V ;        ! to be fragile
@U.V.iv@рачвыӈчетык:@U.V.iv@рачвыӈчет INTER-V ;        ! to pass beyond one another
@U.V.tv@рыйычгыткувык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}йычгыткув INTER-V ;        ! рыйыԓгэтык
@U.V.tv@рыръарӄаторавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ръарӄаторав INTER-V ;        ! to undo the harness
@U.V.tv@рытъивычьэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тъивычь%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to demand
@U.V.tv@рыпынчивык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пынчив INTER-V ;        ! to turn over
@U.V.tv@ринэпыткычитэвык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}ин%{Æ%}пыткычит%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! compete in skill
@U.V.tv@ранпыӈык:@U.V.tv@ранпыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to want to place as a target
@U.V.tv@рыкэтэмэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}кэтэмэв INTER-V ;        ! to ask to be more explicit
@U.V.tv@рытоԓтатык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}тоԓтат INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.tv@выентык:@U.V.tv@в%{ы%}ент INTER-V ;        ! to go through
@U.V.iv@инэнԓеткук:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}нԓетку INTER-V ;        ! to lead
@U.V.iv@тутуккэтык:@U.V.iv@тутукк%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to make flocks
@U.V.iv@мычеэръатык:@U.V.iv@м%{ы%}чеэръат INTER-V ;        ! to crumble
@U.V.iv@ԓявтыквыԓгaтык:@U.V.iv@ԓявтыквыԓгaт INTER-V ;        ! to fix a sinker to the front edge of a net
@U.V.iv@таӈпэратвэк:@U.V.iv@таӈпэратвэ INTER-V ;        ! to dress up
@U.V.iv@кэмчичьэтык:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}мчичь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to tumble
@U.V.iv@чимиръэтръук:@U.V.iv@чимиръ%{Æ%}тръу INTER-V ;        ! to break
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэтэнӈыткук:@U.V.iv@э’ӄэт%{Æ%}нӈытку INTER-V ;        ! to sneer at
@U.V.tv@таныпъаӈык:@U.V.tv@таныпъаӈ INTER-V ;        ! to dry
@U.V.iv@раԓӄакватык:@U.V.iv@раԓӄакват INTER-V ;        ! to see a mirage
@U.V.iv@тэргъарэк:@U.V.iv@тэргъарэ INTER-V ;        ! to stop crying
@U.V.iv@такэрӈык:@U.V.iv@такэрӈ INTER-V ;        ! to make a woman's fur overall
@U.V.iv@а’ԓяйпык:@U.V.iv@а’ԓяйп INTER-V ;        ! to rust
@U.V.iv@ӄымэкэтык:@U.V.iv@ӄымэкэт INTER-V ;        ! to almost die
@U.V.iv@инэрук:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}ру INTER-V ;        ! to eat grilled meat
@U.V.iv@инэкынъук:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}кынъу INTER-V ;        ! to catch with a lasso
@U.V.iv@а’ӄаԓеӈгыпык:@U.V.iv@а’ӄаԓеӈгып INTER-V ;        ! to become anxious
@U.V.iv@таяӈайыръыӈык:@U.V.iv@таяӈайыръыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to stock up
@U.V.iv@турэръук:@U.V.iv@тур%{Æ%}ръу INTER-V ;        ! to eat just boiled meat
@U.V.iv@тыԓек:@U.V.iv@т%{ы%}ԓе INTER-V ;        ! to train one’s body
@U.V.iv@ръэчитык:@U.V.iv@ръ%{Æ%}чит INTER-V ;        ! to wrangle
@U.V.iv@ԓьогтыкватык:@U.V.iv@ԓьогтыкват INTER-V ;        ! to freeze (of the face)
@U.V.tv@чопатык:@U.V.tv@чопат INTER-V ;        ! to soap
@U.V.iv@ивԓеттыԓек:@U.V.iv@ивԓеттыԓе INTER-V ;        ! to grow longer
@U.V.iv@пэԓӄывъик:@U.V.iv@п%{Æ%}ԓӄывъи INTER-V ;        ! to die a natural death
@U.V.iv@ԓыԓепээтык:@U.V.iv@ԓыԓепээт INTER-V ;        ! to swell (of eyes)
@U.V.iv@чаёквыткок:@U.V.iv@чаёквытко INTER-V ;        ! to have a bite
@U.V.tv@рыӄэпԓюнтэтык:@U.V.tv@рыӄэпԓюнтэт INTER-V ;        ! to break off
@U.V.tv@таԓяк:@U.V.tv@таԓя INTER-V ;        ! to strike
@U.V.tv@рэвинвытэгнэнӈык:@U.V.tv@р%{Æ%}винвытэгн%{Æ%}нӈ INTER-V ;        ! to wish to fall on s.o.’s track
@U.V.iv@чечёйпык:@U.V.iv@чечёйп INTER-V ;        ! to put on boots with soles made of « brushes » (under part of the leg) of a reindeer
@U.V.iv@и'рэткук:@U.V.iv@и'р%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to drowse
@U.V.iv@ԓыԓячымъятык:@U.V.iv@ԓыԓячымъят INTER-V ;        ! to smart (of eyes)
@U.V.iv@инэргэԓык:@U.V.iv@инэрг%{Æ%}ԓ INTER-V ;        ! to sink (into snow, marsh, mud)
@U.V.iv@уэ’ԓетык:@U.V.iv@у%{Æ%}’ԓет INTER-V ;        ! to show up black
@U.V.tv@рынрэтвивык:@U.V.tv@рынр%{Æ%}твив INTER-V ;        ! to reduce
@U.V.iv@выԓтычьэтык:@U.V.iv@выԓтычьэт INTER-V ;        ! to draw closer (in case of danger)
@U.V.iv@гаԓгок:@U.V.iv@гаԓго INTER-V ;        ! to catch ducks
@U.V.iv@э’ӈойпык:@U.V.iv@э’ӈойп INTER-V ;        ! to make a lewd gesture
@U.V.tv@пирисӄычетык:@U.V.tv@пирисӄычет INTER-V ;        ! grasp
@U.V.tv@ӄамэнгыргоԓявык:@U.V.tv@ӄамэнгыргоԓяв INTER-V ;        ! to put the dish above
@U.V.iv@э'э'куткук:@U.V.iv@э'%{Æ%}'кутку INTER-V ;        ! to look
@U.V.iv@энарамавык:@U.V.iv@энарамав INTER-V ;        ! to cut up meat
@U.V.iv@иԓьуниԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@иԓьуниԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to sing when beating the drum
@U.V.iv@эмэркэчек:@U.V.iv@эмэркэче INTER-V ;        ! to bustle about housekeeping
@U.V.tv@рычеӈӈытовык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}чеӈӈытов INTER-V ;        ! to hatch
@U.V.tv@рыритԓевык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ритԓев INTER-V ;        ! to sow
@U.V.iv@виԓюк:@U.V.iv@виԓю INTER-V ;        ! to hear
@U.V.iv@мыӈэкаврак:@U.V.iv@м%{ы%}ӈэкавра INTER-V ;        ! to go round in a circle during a ritual
@U.V.tv@кытыйгыръок:@U.V.tv@к%{ы%}тыйгыръо INTER-V ;        ! to be caught by the wind
@U.V.tv@рыгынтэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}гынтэв INTER-V ;        ! to frighten
@U.V.tv@римпэтвэтык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}импэтв%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to slow down
@U.V.iv@ратаӈык:@U.V.iv@ратаӈ INTER-V ;        ! to intend to pass
@U.V.iv@кивԓетык:@U.V.iv@кивԓет INTER-V ;        ! to make soup with reindeer blood
@U.V.tv@рыԓгынйивэтык:@U.V.tv@рыԓгынйив%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to show with one’s finger
@U.V.iv@титумиԓгэтык:@U.V.iv@титумиԓг%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to light a fire on the fire set
@U.V.iv@э’нӄэръук:@U.V.iv@э’нӄ%{Æ%}ръу INTER-V ;        ! to grieve
@U.V.tv@йъэӄуԓик:@U.V.tv@йъ%{Æ%}ӄуԓи INTER-V ;        ! to address rudely
@U.V.iv@ынрэтыԓек:@U.V.iv@ынрэтыԓе INTER-V ;        ! to drag oneself along
@U.V.iv@а'ратык:@U.V.iv@а'рат INTER-V ;        ! to do oneself an injury of inner organs due to excessive efforts
@U.V.iv@ӈэвъэнӄэтык:@U.V.iv@ӈэвъэнӄэт INTER-V ;        ! to refuse to marry
@U.V.iv@таӈпэрак:@U.V.iv@таӈпэра INTER-V ;        ! to be appraised
@U.V.tv@э’йӈэвык:@U.V.tv@э’йӈэв INTER-V ;        ! to call
@U.V.tv@рэрэтык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}эрэт INTER-V ;        ! to let fall
@U.V.iv@тапамъяйӈык:@U.V.iv@тапамъяйӈ INTER-V ;        ! to make inner fur boots
@U.V.iv@инэгнитԓитык:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}гнитԓит INTER-V ;        ! to lift up
@U.V.tv@мэмԓытыёк:@U.V.tv@мэмԓытыё INTER-V ;        ! to fill with water
@U.V.iv@руԓтыԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@руԓтыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to move aside
@U.V.iv@тамӈэнвыӈык:@U.V.iv@тамӈэнвыӈ INTER-V ;        ! to prepare a place for a ritual
@U.V.tv@вэгук:@U.V.tv@в%{Æ%}гу INTER-V ;        ! to cut s.o.’s nails
